Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB183.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Interference with a security camera in a correctional
facility is intentionally covering a security camera in a correctional facility
without authority from the correctional facility.
(b) Aggravated interference with a security camera in a correctional
facility is intentionally:
(1) Removing, damaging or rendering inoperable a security camera in
a correctional facility without authority from the correctional facility; or
(2) covering, removing, damaging or rendering inoperable a security
camera in a correctional facility during a riot at the correctional facility
without authority from the correctional facility.
(c) (1) Interference with a security camera in a correctional facility is
a class A nonperson misdemeanor; and
(2) aggravated interference with a security camera in a correctional
facility as defined in:
(A) Subsection (b)(1) is a severity level 9, nonperson felony; and
(B) subsection (b)(2) is a severity level 6, nonperson felony.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) "Correctional facility" means a:
(A) Jail or correctional facility operated by a city, county or
consolidated law enforcement agency;
(B) correctional institution as defined in K.S.A. 75-5202, and
amendments thereto; or
(C) juvenile detention facility as defined in K.S.A. 38-2302, and
amendments thereto; and
(2) "security camera" means an analog or digital photographic or
video camera or other device capable of recording or transmitting a
photograph, motion picture or other digital image.
(e) This section shall be a part of and supplemental to the Kansas
criminal code.

SB 183 2
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.